sl-SI: Ocena brusa kamna: Odlično; Zadostno; Dobro; Idealno; Se ne uporablja; Slabo; Zelo dobro; Drugo
da: Stenslibningsgrad: Fremragende; Rimelig; God; Ideel; Ikke relevant; Dårlig; Meget god; Andet
ja: 石材加工グレード: エクセレント; フェア; グッド; アイデアル; 該当なし; プア; ベリーグッド; その他
hu: Drágakő csiszolási minősége: Kiváló; Elfogadható; Jó; Ideális; Nem alkalmazható; Gyenge; Nagyon jó; Egyéb
es: Grado de corte de la piedra: Excelente; Regular; Bueno; Ideal; No corresponde; Deficiente; Muy bueno; Otro
zh-TW: 石材切割等級: 極優 (Excellent); 尚可; 良好; 理想; 不適用; 不良; 優良; 其他
zh-CN: 宝石切工等级: 极优; 一般; 良好; 理想; 不适用; 差; 很好; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta brušenja kamena: Odlično; Prosječno; Dobro; Idealno; Nije primjenjivo; Slabo; Vrlo dobro; Ostalo
bg-BG: Степен на шлифовка на камъка: Отлично; Задоволително; Добро; Идеално; Не е приложимо; Лошо; Много добро; Друго
el: Βαθμός κοπής λίθου: Εξαιρετική; Μέτρια; Καλή; Ιδανική; Δεν ισχύει; Κακή; Πολύ καλή; Άλλο
tr: Taş kesim kalitesi: Mükemmel; Orta; İyi; İdeal; Geçerli değil; Kötü; Çok iyi; Diğer
it: Grado di taglio della pietra: Eccellente; Discreto; Buono; Ideale; Non applicabile; Scarso; Molto buono; Altro
nb: Steinskjæringsgrad: Utmerket; Grei; God; Ideell; Ikke aktuelt; Dårlig; Veldig god; Annet
pt-BR: Pedra grau de lapidação: Excelente; Razoável; Bom; Ideal; Não aplicável; Ruim; Muito bom; Outro
en: Stone cut grade: Excellent; Fair; Good; Ideal; Not Applicable; Poor; Very Good; Other
de: Schliffqualität des Steins: Exzellent; Ausreichend; Gut; Ideal; Nicht zutreffend; Schlecht; Sehr gut; Andere
ko: 보석 컷 등급: 엑설런트; 페어; 굿; 아이디얼; 해당 없음; 푸어; 베리 굿; 기타
sv: Slipningskvalitet: Utmärkt; Acceptabel; God; Idealisk; Ej tillämpligt; Dålig; Mycket god; Övrigt
pt-PT: Grau de lapidação da pedra: Excelente; Razoável; Bom; Ideal; Não aplicável; Fraco; Muito bom; Outro
pl: Gatunek kamienia ciętego: Doskonały (Excellent); Zadowalający (Fair); Dobry (Good); Idealny (Ideal); Nie dotyczy; Słaby (Poor); Bardzo dobry (Very Good); Inny
ro-RO: Grad de tăietură a pietrei: Excelent; Acceptabil; Bun; Ideal; Nu se aplică; Slab; Foarte bun; Altele
lt-LT: Akmens pjūvio kokybė: Puikus; Patenkinamas; Geras; Idealus; Netaikoma; Prastas; Labai geras; Kita
fr: Qualité de la taille de la pierre: Excellent; Passable; Bon; Idéal; Sans objet; Médiocre; Très bon; Autre
fi: Kiven hiontaluokka: Erinomainen; Tyydyttävä; Hyvä; Ihanteellinen; Ei sovellettavissa; Huono; Erittäin hyvä; Muu
sk-SK: Trieda rezania kameňa: Excelentný; Uspokojivý; Dobrý; Ideálny; Neaplikovateľné; Slabý; Veľmi dobrý; Iné
th: เกรดการเจียระไนหิน: ดีเยี่ยม; ปานกลาง; ดี; สมบูรณ์แบบ; ไม่ระบุ; ต่ำ; ดีมาก; อื่นๆ
ru: Класс огранки камня: Отличная; Удовлетворительная; Хорошая; Идеальная; Неприменимо; Плохая; Очень хорошая; Другое
nl: Steen slijpkwaliteit: Uitstekend; Redelijk; Goed; Ideaal; Niet van toepassing; Slecht; Zeer goed; Overig
vi: Chất lượng cắt hạt: Xuất sắc; Trung bình; Tốt; Lý tưởng; Không áp dụng; Kém; Rất tốt; Khác
cs: Stupeň brusu: Vynikající; Uspokojivý; Dobrý; Ideální; Nelze použít; Špatný; Velmi dobrý; Jiné